District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.11

Transition of professional counselors.

For a period of 2 years following July 22, 1992, all reference to a professional counselor shall be deemed to refer to a person meeting the requirements for licensure in the District, regardless of whether that person is licensed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 711
as added July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-126, § 2(g), 39 DCR 3824

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3307.11.